District of Columbia statutes.
16-1902

Service of writ; return.

A writ of habeas corpus issued pursuant to this chapter shall be served by delivering it to the officer or other person to whom it is directed, or by leaving it at the prison or place at which the party suing it out is detained. The officer or other person shall forthwith, or within such reasonable time as the court or judge directs:

(1)

make return of the writ and cause the person detained to be brought before the court or judge, according to the command of the writ; and

(2)

certify the true cause of his detainer or imprisonment, if any, and under what color or pretense he is confined or restrained of his liberty.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1902.
1973 Ed., § 16-1902.